Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1688.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 404(a)(1), (b) and (e)(1) and (2)(v) and (vi) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended to read:Section 404. Rate and Amount of Compensation.--Compensation shall be paid to each eligible employe in accordance with the 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 following provisions of this section except that compensation payable with respect to weeks ending in benefit years which begin prior to the first day of January 1989 shall be paid on the basis of the provisions of this section in effect at the beginning of such benefit years.(a) (1) The employe's weekly benefit rate shall be computed as (1) the amount appearing in Part B of the Table Specified for the Determination of Rate and Amount of Benefits on the line on which in Part A there appears his ["highest quarterly wage,"] "average quarterly wage," or (2) fifty per centum (50%) of his full-time weekly wage, whichever is greater. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, if an employe's weekly benefit rate, as calculated under this paragraph, is less than sixty-eight dollars ($68), he shall be ineligible to receive any amount of compensation. If the employe's weekly benefit rate is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar ($1).* * *(b) The ["highest quarterly wages"] "average quarterly wages" of an employe shall be the total wages (computed to the nearest dollar) which were paid to such employe [in that calendar quarter in which such total wages were highest] during the base year, divided by four.* * *(e) (1) Table Specified for the Determination ofRate and Amount of Benefits Part A [Highest] Average QuarterlyWagePart BRate ofCompensationPart CQualifyingWages20250HB1688PN2073 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $1,688 - $1,712 $68 $2,718$1,713 - $1,737 $69 $2,758$1,738 - $1,762 $70 $2,797$1,763 - $1,787 $71 $2,837$1,788 - $1,812 $72 $2,877$1,813 - $1,837 $73 $2,916$1,838 - $1,862 $74 $2,956$1,863 - $1,887 $75 $2,996$1,888 - $1,912 $76 $3,035$1,913 - $1,937 $77 $3,075$1,938 - $1,962 $78 $3,115$1,963 - $1,987 $79 $3,154$1,988 - $2,012 $80 $3,194$2,013 - $2,037 $81 $3,234$2,038 - $2,062 $82 $3,274$2,063 - $2,087 $83 $3,313$2,088 - $2,112 $84 $3,353$2,113 - $2,137 $85 $3,393$2,138 - $2,162 $86 $3,432$2,163 - $2,187 $87 $3,472$2,188 - $2,212 $88 $3,512$2,213 - $2,237 $89 $3,551$2,238 - $2,262 $90 $3,591$2,263 - $2,287 $91 $3,631$2,288 - $2,312 $92 $3,670$2,313 - $2,337 $93 $3,710$2,338 - $2,362 $94 $3,750$2,363 - $2,387 $95 $3,789$2,388 - $2,412 $96 $3,829$2,413 - $2,437 $97 $3,86920250HB1688PN2073 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $2,438 - $2,462 $98 $3,908$2,463 - $2,487 $98 $3,948$2,488 - $2,512 $99 $3,988$2,513 - $2,537 $100 $4,027$2,538 - $2,562 $101 $4,067$2,563 - $2,587 $102 $4,107$2,588 - $2,612 $103 $4,147$2,613 - $2,637 $104 $4,186$2,638 - $2,662 $105 $4,226$2,663 - $2,687 $106 $4,266$2,688 - $2,712 $107 $4,305$2,713 - $2,737 $108 $4,345$2,738 - $2,762 $109 $4,385$2,763 - $2,787 $110 $4,424$2,788 - $2,812 $111 $4,464$2,813 - $2,837 $112 $4,504$2,838 - $2,862 $113 $4,543$2,863 - $2,887 $114 $4,583$2,888 - $2,912 $115 $4,623$2,913 - $2,937 $116 $4,662$2,938 - $2,962 $117 $4,702$2,963 - $2,987 $118 $4,742$2,988 - $3,012 $119 $4,781$3,013 - $3,037 $120 $4,821$3,038 - $3,062 $121 $4,861$3,063 - $3,087 $122 $4,900$3,088 - $3,112 $123 $4,940$3,113 - $3,137 $124 $4,980$3,138 - $3,162 $125 $5,020$3,163 - $3,187 $126 $5,05920250HB1688PN2073 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $3,188 - $3,212 $127 $5,099$3,213 - $3,237 $128 $5,139$3,238 - $3,262 $129 $5,178$3,263 - $3,287 $130 $5,218$3,288 - $3,312 $131 $5,258$3,313 - $3,337 $132 $5,297$3,338 - $3,362 $133 $5,337$3,363 - $3,387 $134 $5,377$3,388 - $3,412 $135 $5,416$3,413 - $3,437 $136 $5,456$3,438 - $3,462 $137 $5,496$3,463 - $3,487 $138 $5,535$3,488 - $3,512 $139 $5,575$3,513 - $3,537 $140 $5,615$3,538 - $3,562 $141 $5,654$3,563 - $3,587 $142 $5,694$3,588 - $3,612 $143 $5,734$3,613 - $3,637 $144 $5,774$3,638 - $3,662 $145 $5,813$3,663 - $3,687 $146 $5,853$3,688 - $3,712 $147 $5,893$3,713 - $3,737 $147 $5,932$3,738 - $3,762 $148 $5,972$3,763 - $3,787 $149 $6,012$3,788 - $3,812 $150 $6,051$3,813 - $3,837 $151 $6,091$3,838 - $3,862 $152 $6,131$3,863 - $3,887 $153 $6,170$3,888 - $3,912 $154 $6,210$3,913 - $3,937 $155 $6,25020250HB1688PN2073 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $3,938 - $3,962 $156 $6,289$3,963 - $3,987 $157 $6,329$3,988 - $4,012 $158 $6,369$4,013 - $4,037 $159 $6,408$4,038 - $4,062 $160 $6,448$4,063 - $4,087 $161 $6,488$4,088 - $4,112 $162 $6,527$4,113 - $4,137 $163 $6,567$4,138 - $4,162 $164 $6,607$4,163 - $4,187 $165 $6,647$4,188 - $4,212 $166 $6,686$4,213 - $4,237 $167 $6,726$4,238 - $4,262 $168 $6,766$4,263 - $4,287 $169 $6,805$4,288 - $4,312 $170 $6,845$4,313 - $4,337 $171 $6,885$4,338 - $4,362 $172 $6,924$4,363 - $4,387 $173 $6,964$4,388 - $4,412 $174 $7,004$4,413 - $4,437 $175 $7,043$4,438 - $4,462 $176 $7,083$4,463 - $4,487 $177 $7,123$4,488 - $4,512 $178 $7,162$4,513 - $4,537 $179 $7,202$4,538 - $4,562 $180 $7,242$4,563 - $4,587 $181 $7,281$4,588 - $4,612 $182 $7,321$4,613 - $4,637 $183 $7,361$4,638 - $4,662 $184 $7,400$4,663 - $4,687 $185 $7,44020250HB1688PN2073 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $4,688 - $4,712 $186 $7,480$4,713 - $4,737 $187 $7,520$4,738 - $4,762 $188 $7,559$4,763 - $4,787 $189 $7,599$4,788 - $4,812 $190 $7,639$4,813 - $4,837 $191 $7,678$4,838 - $4,862 $192 $7,718$4,863 - $4,887 $193 $7,758$4,888 - $4,912 $194 $7,797$4,913 - $4,937 $195 $7,837$4,938 - $4,962 $196 $7,877$4,963 - $4,987 $196 $7,916$4,988 - $5,012 $197 $7,956$5,013 - $5,037 $198 $7,996$5,038 - $5,062 $199 $8,035$5,063 - $5,087 $200 $8,075$5,088 - $5,112 $201 $8,115$5,113 - $5,137 $202 $8,154$5,138 - $5,162 $203 $8,194$5,163 - $5,187 $204 $8,234$5,188 - $5,212 $205 $8,274$5,213 - $5,237 $206 $8,313$5,238 - $5,262 $207 $8,353$5,263 - $5,287 $208 $8,393$5,288 - $5,312 $209 $8,432$5,313 - $5,337 $210 $8,472$5,338 - $5,362 $211 $8,512$5,363 - $5,387 $212 $8,551$5,388 - $5,412 $213 $8,591$5,413 - $5,437 $214 $8,63120250HB1688PN2073 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $5,438 - $5,462 $215 $8,670$5,463 - $5,487 $216 $8,710$5,488 - $5,512 $217 $8,750$5,513 - $5,537 $218 $8,789$5,538 - $5,562 $219 $8,829$5,563 - $5,587 $220 $8,869$5,588 - $5,612 $221 $8,908$5,613 - $5,637 $222 $8,948$5,638 - $5,662 $223 $8,988$5,663 - $5,687 $224 $9,027$5,688 - $5,712 $225 $9,067$5,713 - $5,737 $226 $9,107$5,738 - $5,762 $227 $9,147$5,763 - $5,787 $228 $9,186$5,788 - $5,812 $229 $9,226$5,813 - $5,837 $230 $9,266$5,838 - $5,862 $231 $9,305$5,863 - $5,887 $232 $9,345$5,888 - $5,912 $233 $9,385$5,913 - $5,937 $234 $9,424$5,938 - $5,962 $235 $9,464$5,963 - $5,987 $236 $9,504$5,988 - $6,012 $237 $9,543$6,013 - $6,037 $238 $9,583$6,038 - $6,062 $239 $9,623$6,063 - $6,087 $240 $9,662$6,088 - $6,112 $241 $9,702$6,113 - $6,137 $242 $9,742$6,138 - $6,162 $243 $9,781$6,163 - $6,187 $244 $9,82120250HB1688PN2073 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $6,188 - $6,212 $245 $9,861$6,213 - $6,237 $245 $9,900$6,238 - $6,262 $246 $9,940$6,263 - $6,287 $247 $9,980$6,288 - $6,312 $248 $10,020$6,313 - $6,337 $249 $10,059$6,338 - $6,362 $250 $10,099$6,363 - $6,387 $251 $10,139$6,388 - $6,412 $252 $10,178$6,413 - $6,437 $253 $10,218$6,438 - $6,462 $254 $10,258$6,463 - $6,487 $255 $10,297$6,488 - $6,512 $256 $10,337$6,513 - $6,537 $257 $10,377$6,538 - $6,562 $258 $10,416$6,563 - $6,587 $259 $10,456$6,588 - $6,612 $260 $10,496$6,613 - $6,637 $261 $10,535$6,638 - $6,662 $262 $10,575$6,663 - $6,687 $263 $10,615$6,688 - $6,712 $264 $10,654$6,713 - $6,737 $265 $10,694$6,738 - $6,762 $266 $10,734$6,763 - $6,787 $267 $10,774$6,788 - $6,812 $268 $10,813$6,813 - $6,837 $269 $10,853$6,838 - $6,862 $270 $10,893$6,863 - $6,887 $271 $10,932$6,888 - $6,912 $272 $10,972$6,913 - $6,937 $273 $11,01220250HB1688PN2073 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $6,938 - $6,962 $274 $11,051$6,963 - $6,987 $275 $11,091$6,988 - $7,012 $276 $11,131$7,013 - $7,037 $277 $11,170$7,038 - $7,062 $278 $11,210$7,063 - $7,087 $279 $11,250$7,088 - $7,112 $280 $11,289$7,113 - $7,137 $281 $11,329$7,138 - $7,162 $282 $11,369$7,163 - $7,187 $283 $11,408$7,188 - $7,212 $284 $11,448$7,213 - $7,237 $285 $11,488$7,238 - $7,262 $286 $11,527$7,263 - $7,287 $287 $11,567$7,288 - $7,312 $288 $11,607$7,313 - $7,337 $289 $11,647$7,338 - $7,362 $290 $11,686$7,363 - $7,387 $291 $11,726$7,388 - $7,412 $292 $11,766$7,413 - $7,437 $293 $11,805$7,438 - $7,462 $294 $11,845$7,463 - $7,487 $294 $11,885$7,488 - $7,512 $295 $11,924$7,513 - $7,537 $296 $11,964$7,538 - $7,562 $297 $12,004$7,563 - $7,587 $298 $12,043$7,588 - $7,612 $299 $12,083$7,613 - $7,637 $300 $12,123$7,638 - $7,662 $301 $12,162$7,663 - $7,687 $302 $12,20220250HB1688PN2073 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $7,688 - $7,712 $303 $12,242$7,713 - $7,737 $304 $12,281$7,738 - $7,762 $305 $12,321$7,763 - $7,787 $306 $12,361.00$7,788 - $7,812 $307 $12,400$7,813 - $7,837 $308 $12,440$7,838 - $7,862 $309 $12,480$7,863 - $7,887 $310 $12,520$7,888 - $7,912 $311 $12,559$7,913 - $7,937 $312 $12,599$7,938 - $7,962 $313 $12,639$7,963 - $7,987 $314 $12,678$7,988 - $8,012 $315 $12,718$8,013 - $8,037 $316 $12,758$8,038 - $8,062 $317 $12,797$8,063 - $8,087 $318 $12,837$8,088 - $8,112 $319 $12,877$8,113 - $8,137 $320 $12,916$8,138 - $8,162 $321 $12,956$8,163 - $8,187 $322 $12,996$8,188 - $8,212 $323 $13,035$8,213 - $8,237 $324 $13,075$8,238 - $8,262 $325 $13,115$8,263 - $8,287 $326 $13,154$8,288 - $8,312 $327 $13,194$8,313 - $8,337 $328 $13,234$8,338 - $8,362 $329 $13,274$8,363 - $8,387 $330 $13,313$8,388 - $8,412 $331 $13,353$8,413 - $8,437 $332 $13,39320250HB1688PN2073 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $8,438 - $8,462 $333 $13,432$8,463 - $8,487 $334 $13,472$8,488 - $8,512 $335 $13,512$8,513 - $8,537 $336 $13,551$8,538 - $8,562 $337 $13,591$8,563 - $8,587 $338 $13,631$8,588 - $8,612 $339 $13,670$8,613 - $8,637 $340 $13,710$8,638 - $8,662 $341 $13,750$8,663 - $8,687 $342 $13,789$8,688 - $8,712 $343 $13,829$8,713 - $8,737 $343 $13,869$8,738 - $8,762 $344 $13,908$8,763 - $8,787 $345 $13,948$8,788 - $8,812 $346 $13,988$8,813 - $8,837 $347 $14,027$8,838 - $8,862 $348 $14,067$8,863 - $8,887 $349 $14,107$8,888 - $8,912 $350 $14,147$8,913 - $8,937 $351 $14,186$8,938 - $8,962 $352 $14,226$8,963 - $8,987 $353 $14,266$8,988 - $9,012 $354 $14,305$9,013 - $9,037 $355 $14,345$9,038 - $9,062 $356 $14,385$9,063 - $9,087 $357 $14,424$9,088 - $9,112 $358 $14,464$9,113 - $9,137 $359 $14,504$9,138 - $9,162 $360 $14,543$9,163 - $9,187 $361 $14,58320250HB1688PN2073 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $9,188 - $9,212 $362 $14,623$9,213 - $9,237 $363 $14,662$9,238 - $9,262 $364 $14,702$9,263 - $9,287 $365 $14,742$9,288 - $9,312 $366 $14,781$9,313 - $9,337 $367 $14,821$9,338 - $9,362 $368 $14,861$9,363 - $9,387 $369 $14,900$9,388 - $9,412 $370 $14,940$9,413 - $9,437 $371 $14,980$9,438 - $9,462 $372 $15,020$9,463 - $9,487 $373 $15,059$9,488 - $9,512 $374 $15,099$9,513 - $9,537 $375 $15,139$9,538 - $9,562 $376 $15,178$9,563 - $9,587 $377 $15,218$9,588 - $9,612 $378 $15,258$9,613 - $9,637 $379 $15,297$9,638 - $9,662 $380 $15,337$9,663 - $9,687 $381 $15,377$9,688 - $9,712 $382 $15,416$9,713 - $9,737 $383 $15,456$9,738 - $9,762 $384 $15,496$9,763 - $9,787 $385 $15,535$9,788 - $9,812 $386 $15,575$9,813 - $9,837 $387 $15,615$9,838 - $9,862 $388 $15,654$9,863 - $9,887 $389 $15,694$9,888 - $9,912 $390 $15,734$9,913 - $9,937 $391 $15,77420250HB1688PN2073 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $9,938 - $9,962 $392 $15,813$9,963 - $9,987 $392 $15,853$9,988 - $10,012 $393 $15,893$10,013 - $10,037 $394 $15,932$10,038 - $10,062 $395 $15,972$10,063 - $10,087 $396 $16,012$10,088 - $10,112 $397 $16,051$10,113 - $10,137 $398 $16,091$10,138 - $10,162 $399 $16,131$10,163 - $10,187 $400 $16,170$10,188 - $10,212 $401 $16,210$10,213 - $10,237 $402 $16,250$10,238 - $10,262 $403 $16,289$10,263 - $10,287 $404 $16,329$10,288 - $10,312 $405 $16,369$10,313 - $10,337 $406 $16,408$10,338 - $10,362 $407 $16,448$10,363 - $10,387 $408 $16,488$10,388 - $10,412 $409 $16,527$10,413 - $10,437 $410 $16,567$10,438 - $10,462 $411 $16,607$10,463 - $10,487 $412 $16,647$10,488 - $10,512 $413 $16,686$10,513 - $10,537 $414 $16,726$10,538 - $10,562 $415 $16,766$10,563 - $10,587 $416 $16,805$10,588 - $10,612 $417 $16,845$10,613 - $10,637 $418 $16,885$10,638 - $10,662 $419 $16,924$10,663 - $10,687 $420 $16,96420250HB1688PN2073 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $10,688 - $10,712 $421 $17,004$10,713 - $10,737 $422 $17,043$10,738 - $10,762 $423 $17,083$10,763 - $10,787 $424 $17,123$10,788 - $10,812 $425 $17,162$10,813 - $10,837 $426 $17,202$10,838 - $10,862 $427 $17,242$10,863 - $10,887 $428 $17,281$10,888 - $10,912 $429 $17,321$10,913 - $10,937 $430 $17,361$10,938 - $10,962 $431 $17,400$10,963 - $10,987 $432 $17,440$10,988 - $11,012 $433 $17,480$11,013 - $11,037 $434 $17,520$11,038 - $11,062 $435 $17,559$11,063 - $11,087 $436 $17,599$11,088 - $11,112 $437 $17,639$11,113 - $11,137 $438 $17,678$11,138 - $11,162 $439 $17,718$11,163 - $11,187 $440 $17,758$11,188 - $11,212 $441 $17,797$11,213 - $11,237 $441 $17,837$11,238 - $11,262 $442 $17,877$11,263 - $11,287 $443 $17,916$11,288 - $11,312 $444 $17,956$11,313 - $11,337 $445 $17,996$11,338 - $11,362 $446 $18,035$11,363 - $11,387 $447 $18,075$11,388 - $11,412 $448 $18,115$11,413 - $11,437 $449 $18,15420250HB1688PN2073 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $11,438 - $11,462 $450 $18,194$11,463 - $11,487 $451 $18,234$11,488 - $11,512 $452 $18,274$11,513 - $11,537 $453 $18,313$11,538 - $11,562 $454 $18,353$11,563 - $11,587 $455 $18,393$11,588 - $11,612 $456 $18,432$11,613 - $11,637 $457 $18,472$11,638 - $11,662 $458 $18,512$11,663 - $11,687 $459 $18,551$11,688 - $11,712 $460 $18,591$11,713 - $11,737 $461 $18,631$11,738 - $11,762 $462 $18,670$11,763 - $11,787 $463 $18,710$11,788 - $11,812 $464 $18,750$11,813 - $11,837 $465 $18,789$11,838 - $11,862 $466 $18,829$11,863 - $11,887 $467 $18,869$11,888 - $11,912 $468 $18,908$11,913 - $11,937 $469 $18,948$11,938 - $11,962 $470 $18,988$11,963 - $11,987 $471 $19,027$11,988 - $12,012 $472 $19,067$12,013 - $12,037 $473 $19,107$12,038 - $12,062 $474 $19,147$12,063 - $12,087 $475 $19,186$12,088 - $12,112 $476 $19,226$12,113 - $12,137 $477 $19,266$12,138 - $12,162 $478 $19,305$12,163 - $12,187 $479 $19,34520250HB1688PN2073 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $12,188 - $12,212 $480 $19,385$12,213 - $12,237 $481 $19,424$12,238 - $12,262 $482 $19,464$12,263 - $12,287 $483 $19,504$12,288 - $12,312 $484 $19,543$12,313 - $12,337 $485 $19,583$12,338 - $12,362 $486 $19,623$12,363 - $12,387 $487 $19,662$12,388 - $12,412 $488 $19,702$12,413 - $12,437 $489 $19,742$12,438 - $12,462 $490 $19,781$12,463 - $12,487 $490 $19,821$12,488 - $12,512 $491 $19,861$12,513 - $12,537 $492 $19,900$12,538 - $12,562 $493 $19,940$12,563 - $12,587 $494 $19,980$12,588 - $12,612 $495 $20,020$12,613 - $12,637 $496 $20,059$12,638 - $12,662 $497 $20,099$12,663 - $12,687 $498 $20,139$12,688 - $12,712 $499 $20,178$12,713 - $12,737 $500 $20,218$12,738 - $12,762 $501 $20,258$12,763 - $12,787 $502 $20,297$12,788 - $12,812 $503 $20,337$12,813 - $12,837 $504 $20,377$12,838 - $12,862 $505 $20,416$12,863 - $12,887 $506 $20,456$12,888 - $12,912 $507 $20,496$12,913 - $12,937 $508 $20,53520250HB1688PN2073 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $12,938 - $12,962 $509 $20,575$12,963 - $12,987 $510 $20,615$12,988 - $13,012 $511 $20,654$13,013 - $13,037 $512 $20,694$13,038 - $13,062 $513 $20,734$13,063 - $13,087 $514 $20,774$13,088 - $13,112 $515 $20,813$13,113 - $13,137 $516 $20,853$13,138 - $13,162 $517 $20,893$13,163 - $13,187 $518 $20,932$13,188 - $13,212 $519 $20,972$13,213 - $13,237 $520 $21,012$13,238 - $13,262 $521 $21,051$13,263 - $13,287 $522 $21,091$13,288 - $13,312 $523 $21,131$13,313 - $13,337 $524 $21,170$13,338 - $13,362 $525 $21,210$13,363 - $13,387 $526 $21,250$13,388 - $13,412 $527 $21,289$13,413 - $13,437 $528 $21,329$13,438 - $13,462 $529 $21,369$13,463 - $13,487 $530 $21,408$13,488 - $13,512 $531 $21,448$13,513 - $13,537 $532 $21,488$13,538 - $13,562 $533 $21,527$13,563 - $13,587 $534 $21,567$13,588 - $13,612 $535 $21,607$13,613 - $13,637 $536 $21,647$13,638 - $13,662 $537 $21,686$13,663 - $13,687 $538 $21,72620250HB1688PN2073 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $13,688 - $13,712 $539 $21,766$13,713 - $13,737 $539 $21,805$13,738 - $13,762 $540 $21,845$13,763 - $13,787 $541 $21,885$13,788 - $13,812 $542 $21,924$13,813 - $13,837 $543 $21,964$13,838 - $13,862 $544 $22,004$13,863 - $13,887 $545 $22,043$13,888 - $13,912 $546 $22,083$13,913 - $13,937 $547 $22,123$13,938 - $13,962 $548 $22,162$13,963 - $13,987 $549 $22,202$13,988 - $14,012 $550 $22,242$14,013 - $14,037 $551 $22,281$14,038 - $14,062 $552 $22,321$14,063 - $14,087 $553 $22,361$14,088 - $14,112 $554 $22,400$14,113 - $14,137 $555 $22,440$14,138 - $14,162 $556 $22,480$14,163 - $14,187 $557 $22,520$14,188 - $14,212 $558 $22,559$14,213 - $14,237 $559 $22,599$14,238 - $14,262 $560 $22,639$14,263 or more $561 Amount required under section 401(a)(2)(2) * * *[(v) If, on July 1, 2025, the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is less than two hundred fifty per centum (250%), the following shall apply:(A) Notwithstanding the definition of "highest quarterly 20250HB1688PN2073 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wages" in subsection (b), but subject to subclause (vi), "highest quarterly wages" for purposes of this section for calendar years 2026 and thereafter shall be the average of the total wages (computed to the nearest dollar), which were paid to the employe computed as follows:(I) The wages paid to the employe in that calendar quarter in which such total wages were highest during the base year shall be calculated.(II) The amount calculated under division (I) shall be added to an amount equal to one hundred thirty per centum (130%) of the wages paid to the employe in the calendar quarter in which such total wages were the second highest of any calendar quarter during the base year, provided that the amount added under this division (II) may not be greater than the wages paid to the employe during the highest calendar quarter under division (I).(III) The sum calculated under division (II) shall be divided by two.(B) Notwithstanding section 401(a)(2), and except as provided in subsections (a)(3) and (e)(1) and (2), section 401(a) shall require that the second entry in Part A of the table for the determination of rate and amount of benefits, on the line on which there appears the employe's weekly benefit rate, does not exceed sixty-three per centum (63%) of the employe's total base year wages.(vi) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) and subclause (v) if, on July 1, 2026, or July 1 of any subsequent year, the trigger percentage determined under section 301.7(a) is at least two hundred fifty per centum (250%), the following shall apply:(A) "Highest quarterly wages" for the subsequent calendar 20250HB1688PN2073 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year and thereafter shall be determined as provided in subsection (b) and not as provided in subclause (v).(B) Section 401(a)(2) shall apply and not subclause (v)(B).]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1688PN2073 - 21 - 12345